src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls-unacc/V-T-I-ssksini_gt-norm-unacc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  +ero+:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.+fst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.+fst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - ssksini - ok : # -m transitive inanimate verb, know AEW NA1
     ssksini+VTI+Ind+1Sg+0SgO: nitssksinihpa
     PS/matt+PS/oht+PS/ohko+ssksini+VTI+Ind+21Pl+0SgO: mattohtohkoissksini'pa
     ssksini+VTI+Ind+3Pl+0PlO+PRO+3/0Pl: issksinimiaawa
     ssksini+VTI+Ind+2Sg+0SgO: kitssksinihpa
     PS/ohkott+ssksini+VTI+Ind+2Sg+0SgO: kitohkottssksinihpa
     PS/maat+PS/oht+ssksini+VTI+Ind+1Sg+0SgO: nimaatohtssksinihpa
     PS/ii+ssksini+VTI+Ind+3Pl+0PlO: iissksinimi
     PS/yaak+PS/aanist+ssksini+VTI+Ind+21Pl+0SgO: aakanistssksini'pa
     PS/oht+PS/a'+PS/o't+PS/ohko+ssksini+VTI+Ind+3Pl+0PlO+PRO+3/0Pl: iihtao'tohkoissksinimiaawa
